Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.605

Graduate fellowship trust fund program—Establishment—Administration.

The Washington graduate fellowship trust fund program is established. The program shall be administered by the office. The trust fund shall be administered by the state treasurer. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the Washington graduate fellowship trust fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

[ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 905; (2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 904 expired July 1, 2012); 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 116; 1987 c 147 s 2. Formerly RCW 28B.10.881.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 905: "Section 905 of this act takes effect July 1, 2012." [ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 915.]

Expiration date—2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 904: "Section 904 of this act expires July 1, 2012." [ 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 914.]

Effective dates—2011 2nd sp.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28B.50.837.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.